Maryland, session 2026, SB0723.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless
otherwise apparent from context.
(c) “Deed” includes any deed, grant, mortgage, deed of trust, lease, assignment,
and release, pertaining to land or property or any interest therein or appurtenant thereto,
including an interest in rents and profits from rents.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0723*

SENATE BILL 723
3–104.
(f) (7) IF A PURCHASER OR OTHER PARTY HAS OBTAINED TITLE
INSURANCE FOR A TRANSACTION INVOLVING RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, A DEED
PRESENTED FOR RECORDING EFFECTING A CHANGE IN OWNERSHIP SHALL CONTAIN
THE NAME OF THE TITLE INSURER AND THE POLICY NUMBER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.